Utah statutes.
34-25-1.   "Vice-principal" defined.

All persons engaged in the service of any person and entrusted by such employer with authority of superintendence, control or command of other persons in the employ or service of such employer, or with authority to direct any other employee in the performance of any duties of such employee, are vice-principals of such employer, and are not fellow servants.



Enacted by Chapter 85, 1969 General Session

